test/src/morphology/N-sikak_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - sikâk - ok : # -k final animate noun 'goose'
     sikâk+N+AN+Sg: sikâk
     sikâk+N+AN+Pl: sikâkk
     sikâk+N+AN+Loc: niskihk
     sikâk+N+AN+Dim+Sg: sikâksis
     sikâk+N+AN+Dim+Pl: sikâksisak

     sikâk+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nisikâk
     sikâk+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kisikâk
     sikâk+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg: osikâk
     sikâk+N+AN+Sg+Px3iSg: osikâkyiw
     sikâk+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nisikâknân
     sikâk+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kisikâknân
     sikâk+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kisikâkâw
     sikâk+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl: osikâkâw
     sikâk+N+AN+Sg+Px3iPl: osikâkiyiw

     sikâk+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nisikâkak
     sikâk+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kisikâkak
     sikâk+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg: osikâka
     sikâk+N+AN+Pl+Px3iSg: osikâkiyiwa
     sikâk+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nisikâkinânak
     sikâk+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kisikâknawak
     sikâk+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kisikâkiwâwak
     sikâk+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl: osikâkwâwa
     sikâk+N+AN+Pl+Px3iPl: osikâkyiwa

     sikâk+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px1Sg: nisikâkosis
     sikâk+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px2Sg: kisikâkosis
     sikâk+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px3Sg: osikâkosis
     sikâk+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px3iSg: osikâkosisiyiw
     sikâk+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px1Pl: nisikâkosisnân
     sikâk+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px12Pl: kisikâkosisnân
     sikâk+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px2Pl: kisikâkosisâw
     sikâk+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px3Pl: osikâkosisâw
     sikâk+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px3iPl: osikâkosisiyiw
 
     sikâk+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px1Sg: nisikâkisak
     sikâk+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px2Sg: kisikâkisak
     sikâk+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px3Sg: osikâkisa
     sikâk+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px3iSg: osikâkisiyiwa
     sikâk+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px1Pl: nisikâkisinânak
     sikâk+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px12Pl: kisikâksisnawak
     sikâk+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px2Pl: kisikâkisnawak
     sikâk+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px3Pl: kisikâkisiwâwak
     sikâk+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px3iPl: osikâkisyiwa
     
     sikâk+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitsikâkihk
     sikâk+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitsikâkihk
     sikâk+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: otsikâkihk
     sikâk+N+AN+Px3iSg+Loc: otsikâkyihk
     sikâk+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nisinânihk
     sikâk+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitsikâknâhk
     sikâk+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kisiwâwihk
     sikâk+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: osiwâwihk 
     sikâk+N+AN+Px3iPl+Loc: otsikâkyihk

     sikâk+N+AN+Dim+Px1Sg+Loc: nisikâkisihk
     sikâk+N+AN+Dim+Px2Sg+Loc: kisikâkisihk
     sikâk+N+AN+Dim+Px3Sg+Loc: osikâkisihk
     sikâk+N+AN+Dim+Px3iSg+Loc: osikâkisiyihk
     sikâk+N+AN+Dim+Px1Pl+Loc: nisikâkisinânihk
     sikâk+N+AN+Dim+Px12Pl+Loc: kisikâkisinâhk
     sikâk+N+AN+Dim+Px2Pl+Loc: kisikâkisiwâwihk
     sikâk+N+AN+Dim+Px3Pl+Loc: osikâkisiwâwihk
     sikâk+N+AN+Dim+Px3iPl+Loc: osikâkisiyihk
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
